Utah statutes.
26-4-9.   Custody of dead body and personal effects -- Examination of scene
of death -- Preservation of body -- Autopsies.
(1)  Upon notification of a death under Section 26-4-8, the medical examiner
shall assume custody of the deceased body, clothing on the body, biological
samples taken, and any article on or near the body which may aid him in
determining the cause of death except those articles which will assist the
investigative agency to proceed without delay with the investigation. In all
cases the scene of the event shall not be disturbed until authorization is
given by the senior ranking peace officer from the law enforcement agency
having jurisdiction of the case and conducting the investigation. Where death
appears to have occurred under circumstances listed in Section 26-4-7, the
person or persons finding or having custody of the body, or jurisdiction over
the investigation of the death, shall take reasonable precautions to preserve
the body and body fluids so that minimum deterioration takes place. The body
shall not be moved without permission of the medical examiner, district
attorney, or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction, or his authorized
deputy except in cases of affront to public decency or circumstances where it
is not practical to leave the body where found, or in such cases where the
cause of death is clearly due to natural causes. The body can under direction
of a licensed physician or the medical examiner or his designated
representative be moved to a place specified by a funeral director, the
attending physician, the medical examiner, or his representative.
(2)  In the event the body, where referred to the medical examiner, is moved,
no cleansing or embalming of the body shall occur without the permission of
the medical examiner. An intentional or knowing violation of this Subsection
(2) is a class B misdemeanor.
(3)  When the medical examiner assumes lawful custody of a body under
Subsection 26-4-7(3) solely because the death was unattended, an autopsy shall
not be performed unless requested by the district attorney, county attorney
having criminal jurisdiction, or law enforcement agency having jurisdiction of
the place where the body is found, or a licensed physician, or a spouse,
child, parent or guardian of the deceased, and a licensed physician. The
county attorney or district attorney and law enforcement agency having
jurisdiction shall consult with the medical examiner to determine the need for
an autopsy. In any such case concerning unattended deaths qualifying as exempt
from autopsy, a death certificate may be certified by a licensed physician. In
this case the physician may be established as the medical examiner's
designated representative. Requested autopsies shall not be performed when the
medical examiner or his designated representative determines the autopsy to be
unnecessary, provided that an autopsy requested by a district or county
attorney or law enforcement agency may only be determined to be unnecessary if
the cause of death can be ascertained without an autopsy being performed.
